Hawaii statutes.
§806-83 Felonies for which criminal
charges may be instituted by written information. (a) Criminal charges
may be instituted by written information for a felony when the charge is a
class C felony under:

(1) Section 19-3.5 (voter fraud);

(2) Section 128D-10 (knowing releases);

(3) Section 132D-14(a)(1), (2)(A), and (3) (relating
to penalties for failure to comply with requirements of sections 132D-7,
132D-10, and 132D-16);

(4) Section 134-7(a) and (b) (ownership or possession
prohibited);

(5) Section 134-8 (ownership, etc., of automatic
firearms, silencers, etc., prohibited; penalties);

(6) Section 134-9 (licenses to carry);

(7) Section 134-17(a) (relating to false information
or evidence concerning psychiatric or criminal history);

(8) Section 134-24 (place to keep unloaded firearms
other than pistols and revolvers);

(9) Section 134-51 (deadly weapons);

(10) Section 134-52 (switchblade knives);

(11) Section 134-53 (butterfly knives);

(12) Section 188-23 (possession or use of explosives,
electrofishing devices, and poisonous substances in state waters prohibited);

(13) Section 231-34 (attempt to evade or defeat tax);

(14) Section 231-36 (false and fraudulent statements);

(15) Section 245-37 (sale or purchase of packages of
cigarettes without stamps);

(16) Section 245-38 (vending unstamped cigarettes);

(17) Section 245-51 (export and foreign cigarettes
prohibited);

(18) Section 245-52 (alteration of packaging
prohibited);

(19) Section 291C-12.5 (accidents involving substantial
bodily injury);

(20) Section 291E-61.5 (habitually operating a vehicle
under the influence of an intoxicant);

(21) Section 329-41 (prohibited acts B--penalties);

(22) Section 329-42 (prohibited acts C--penalties);

(23) Section 329-43.5 (prohibited acts related to drug
paraphernalia);

(24) Section 329C-2 (manufacture, distribution, or
possession with intent to distribute an imitation controlled substance to a
person under eighteen years of age);

(25) Section 346-34(d)(2) and (e) (relating to fraud
involving food stamps or coupons);

(26) Section 346-43.5 (medical assistance [fraud];
penalties);

(27) Section 383-141 (falsely obtaining benefits,
etc.);

(28) Section 431:2-403(b)(2) (insurance fraud);

(29) Section 482D-7 (violation of fineness standards
and stamping requirements);

(30) Section 485A-301 (securities registration
requirement);

(31) Section 485A-401 (broker-dealer registration
requirement and exemptions);

(32) Section 485A-402 (agent registration requirement
and exemptions);

(33) Section 485A-403 (investment adviser registration
requirement and exemptions);

(34) Section 485A-404 (investment adviser
representative registration requirement and exemptions);

(35) Section 485A-405 (federal covered investment
adviser notice filing requirement);

(36) Section 485A-501 (general fraud);

(37) Section 485A-502 (prohibited conduct in providing
investment advice);

(38) Section 707-703 (negligent homicide in the second
degree);

(39) Section 707-705 (negligent injury in the first
degree);

(40) Section 707-711 (assault in the second degree);

(41) Section 707-713 (reckless endangering in the
first degree);

(42) Section 707-721 (unlawful imprisonment in the
first degree);

(43) Section 707-726 (custodial interference in the
first degree);

(44) Section 707-757 (electronic enticement of a child
in the second degree);

(45) Section 707-766 (extortion in the second degree);

(46) Section 708-811 (burglary in the second degree);

(47) Section 708-812.6 (unauthorized entry in a
dwelling in the second degree);

(48) Section 708-821 (criminal property damage in the
second degree);

(49) Section 708-831 (theft in the second degree);

(50) Section 708-833.5 (shoplifting);

(51) Section 708-835.5 (theft of livestock);

(52) Section 708-836 (unauthorized control of
propelled vehicle);

(53) Section 708-836.5 (unauthorized entry into motor
vehicle in the first degree);

(54) Section 708-839.5 (theft of utility services);

(55) Section 708-839.55 (unauthorized possession of confidential
personal information);

(56) Section 708-839.8 (identity theft in the third
degree);

(57) Section 708-852 (forgery in the second degree);

(58) Section 708-854 (criminal possession of a forgery
device);

(59) Section 708-858 (suppressing a testamentary or
recordable instrument);

(60) Section 708-875 (trademark counterfeiting);

(61) Section 708-891.6 (computer fraud in the third
degree);

(62) Section 708-892.6 (computer damage in the third
degree);

(63) Section 708-895.7 (unauthorized computer access
in the third degree);

(64) Section 708-8100 (fraudulent use of a credit
card);

(65) Section 708-8102 (theft, forgery, etc., of credit
cards);

(66) Section 708-8103 (credit card fraud by a provider
of goods or services);

(67) Section 708-8104 (possession of unauthorized
credit card machinery or incomplete cards);

(68) Section 708-8200 (cable television service fraud
in the first degree);

(69) Section 708-8202 (telecommunication service fraud
in the first degree);

(70) Section 709-903.5 (endangering the welfare of a
minor in the first degree);

(71) Section 709-906 (abuse of family or household
members);

(72) Section 710-1016.3 (obtaining a government-issued
identification document under false pretenses in the first degree);

(73) Section 710-1016.6 (impersonating a law
enforcement officer in the first degree);

(74) Section 710-1017.5 (sale or manufacture of
deceptive identification document);

(75) Section 710-1018 (securing the proceeds of an
offense);

(76) Section 710-1021 (escape in the second degree);

(77) Section 710-1023 (promoting prison contraband in
the second degree);

(78) Section 710-1024 (bail jumping in the first
degree);

(79) Section 710-1029 (hindering prosecution in the
first degree);

(80) Section 710-1060 (perjury);

(81) Section 710-1072.5 (obstruction of justice);

(82) Section 711-1103 (riot);

(83) Section 711-1109.35 (cruelty to animals by
fighting dogs in the second degree);

(84) Section 711-1110.9 (violation of privacy in the
first degree);

(85) Section 711-1112 (interference with the operator
of a public transit vehicle);

(86) Section 712-1221 (promoting gambling in the first
degree);

(87) Section 712-1222.5 (promoting gambling aboard
ships);

(88) Section 712-1224 (possession of gambling records
in the first degree);

(89) Section 712-1243 (promoting a dangerous drug in
the third degree);

(90) Section 712-1246 (promoting a harmful drug in the
third degree);

(91) Section 712-1247 (promoting a detrimental drug in
the first degree);

(92) Section 712-1249.6(1)(a), (b), or (c) (promoting
a controlled substance in, on, or near schools, school vehicles, public parks,
or public housing projects or complexes);

(93) Section 803-42 (interception, access, and
disclosure of wire, oral, or electronic communications, use of pen register,
trap and trace device, and mobile tracking device prohibited); or

(94) Section 846E-9 (failure to comply with covered
offender registration requirements).

(b) Criminal charges may be instituted by written
information for a felony when the charge is a class B felony under:

(1) Section 134-7(b) (ownership or possession
prohibited, when; penalty);

(2) Section 134-23 (place to keep loaded firearms
other than pistols and revolvers; penalties);

(3) Section 134-25 (place to keep pistol or revolver;
penalty);

(4) Section 134-26 (carrying or possessing a loaded
firearm on a public highway; penalty);

(5) Section 329-43.5 (prohibited acts related to drug
paraphernalia);

(6) Section 708-810 (burglary in the first degree);

(7) Section 708-830.5 (theft in the first degree);

(8) Section 708-839.7 (identity theft in the second
degree);

(9) Section 708-851 (forgery in the first degree);

(10) Section 708-891.5 (computer fraud in the second
degree);

(11) Section 708-892.5 (computer damage in the second
degree);

(12) Section 712-1242 (promoting a dangerous drug in
the second degree);

(13) Section 712-1245 (promoting a harmful drug in the
second degree); or

(14) Section 712-1249.5 (commercial promotion of
marijuana in the second degree).

(c) Criminal charges may be instituted by
written information for a felony when the charge is a felony under:

(1) Section 19-3 (election frauds);

(2) Section 480-4 (combinations in restraint of
trade, price-fixing and limitation of production prohibited);

(3) Section 480-6 (refusal to deal); or

(4) Section 480-9 (monopolization).

(d) Criminal charges may be instituted by
written information for a felony when the charge is a charge under section
329-46 (prohibited acts related to visits to more than one practitioner to
obtain controlled substance prescriptions) and the comparable offense under
part IV of chapter 712 as enumerated in subsection (a), (b), or (c).

(e) Criminal charges may be instituted by written
information for a felony when the charge is a charge that involves section
702-221 (liability for conduct of another), section 702-222 (liability for the
conduct of another; complicity), section 702-223 (liability for the conduct of
another; complicity with respect to the result), section 705-500 (criminal
attempt), section 705-510 (criminal solicitation), or section 705-520 (criminal
conspiracy), and the underlying offense is an offense listed above in
subsection (a), (b), (c), or (d). [L 2004, c 62, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 66, §5,
c 104, §1, and c 229, §16; am L 2009, c 149, §8; am L 2010, c 114, §1; am L
2013, c 64, §2; am L 2015, c 35, §33; am L 2016, c 231, §65]

Note

The 2013 amendment applies to any acts committed prior to,
on, or after April 30, 2013. L 2013, c 64, §11.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next